New York, session 2025-2026, S281.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. It is the sense of the legislature 2 that determinations regarding restrictions upon the residence of sex 3 offenders who are required to register pursuant to the provisions of 4 article 6-C of the correction law should be made by the local munici- 5 pality in which such offenders reside since municipalities are in a 6 better position than the state, after taking into consideration local 7 conditions and after determining what entities with vulnerable popu- 8 lations would require protection from registered sex offenders, to make 9 such determinations. 10 § 2. Section 168-w of the correction law, as renumbered by chapter 604 11 of the laws of 2005, is renumbered section 168-x and a new section 168-w 12 is added to read as follows: 13 § 168-w. Municipal residency restrictions. Any municipality may enact 14 a local law which imposes residency restrictions upon sex offenders 15 required to register pursuant to this article, provided that such resi- 16 dency restrictions are no less restrictive than the requirements set 17 forth in paragraph (a) of subdivision four-a of section 65.10 of the 18 penal law and subdivision fourteen of section two hundred fifty-nine-c 19 of the executive law. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00442-01-5